Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 4

Feeding Garbage to Swine

44-2-401. Title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Garbage Feeding Law.”

Acts 1953, ch. 94, § 1 (Williams, § 5066.18); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1001, 44-5-101.

Cross-References. Humane treatment of animals not subject to state game and fish laws, §5-9-110.

44-2-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Garbage” means animal or plant waste resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking or consumption of foods, including animal and fowl carcasses or parts thereof, and all waste material and by-products of a kitchen, restaurant, hospital, hotel, motel, or slaughterhouse; except, however, bakery waste, whey, or other dairy waste from milk processing plants shall not be included in this definition; and

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity or any organization, political subdivision or governmental agency.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1002, 44-5-102.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 33-1002 — 44-1012 (Acts 1953, ch. 94, §§ 2-8; Williams §§ 5066.19-5066.25) were repealed by Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 1. The present §§44-2-402 —44-2-408 (formerly §§44-5-102 —44-5-108) were enacted by § 2 of Acts 1973, ch. 17.

44-2-403. Enforcing official.

This part shall be enforced and administered by the commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1003, 44-5-103.

44-2-404. When feeding garbage to swine allowed.

It is unlawful for any person to feed garbage to swine except:

Any individual who feeds only that person's own household garbage to that person's own swine; or

Garbage that has been processed in a manner prescribed and approved by the commissioner.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1004, 44-5-104.

44-2-405. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as, in the commissioner's opinion, are necessary to implement this part.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1005, 44-5-105.

44-2-406. Inspection of premises.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative may enter upon any premises, public or private, for the purpose of determining if a violation of this part has occurred.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1006, 44-5-106.

44-2-407. Penalty for violations.

A violation of this part by any person is a Class C misdemeanor.

Each illegal feeding of garbage is to be considered a separate offense.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1007, 44-5-107; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-2-408. Enjoining violations of law.

The commissioner, upon determining that any person may have violated any provision of this part, may petition for injunctive relief from further violation. The petition shall be addressed to the chancery court in the county in which the offense occurred or in which the offender's principal place of business is located or where the offender is doing business or resides. The chancellor, on determining that probable cause of a violation of this part exists, shall issue appropriate injunctive relief.

Acts 1973, ch. 17, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 44-1008, 44-5-108.

Parts 5-9

[Reserved]